test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-nouns1-Oct_2016_gt-norm.yaml
    lõuna+N+Sg+Gen: lõuna
    lõuna+N+Sg+Ill: lõunasse
    lõuna+N+Sg+Ine: lõunas
    lõuna+N+Sg+Nom: lõuna
    lõuna+N+Sg+Par: lõunat
    lõuna+N+Sg+Tra: lõunaks
    lõuna+N+Sg+Trm: lõunani
    magu+N+Pl+Abe: magudeta
    magu+N+Pl+Abl: magudelt
    magu+N+Pl+Ade: magudel
    magu+N+Pl+All: magudele
    magu+N+Pl+Com: magudega
    magu+N+Pl+Ela: magudest
    magu+N+Pl+Ess: magudena
    magu+N+Pl+Gen: magude
    magu+N+Pl+Ill: magudesse
    magu+N+Pl+Ine: magudes
    magu+N+Pl+Nom: maod
    magu+N+Pl+Par: magusid
    magu+N+Pl+Tra: magudeks
    magu+N+Pl+Trm: magudeni
    magu+N+Sg+Abe: maota
    magu+N+Sg+Abl: maolt
    magu+N+Sg+Ade: maol
    magu+N+Sg+All: maole
    magu+N+Sg+Com: maoga
    magu+N+Sg+Ela: maost
    magu+N+Sg+Ess: maona
    magu+N+Sg+Gen: mao
    magu+N+Sg+Ill: makku
    magu+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: maosse
    magu+N+Sg+Ine: maos
    magu+N+Sg+Nom: magu
    magu+N+Sg+Par: magu
    magu+N+Sg+Tra: maoks
    magu+N+Sg+Trm: maoni
    mailer+N+Pl+Abe: maileriteta
    mailer+N+Pl+Abl: maileritelt
    mailer+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: mailereilt
    mailer+N+Pl+Ade: maileritel
    mailer+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: mailereil
    mailer+N+Pl+All: maileritele
    mailer+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: mailereile
    mailer+N+Pl+Com: maileritega
    mailer+N+Pl+Ela: maileritest
    mailer+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: mailereist
    mailer+N+Pl+Ess: maileritena
    mailer+N+Pl+Gen: mailerite
    mailer+N+Pl+Ill: maileritesse
    mailer+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: mailereisse
    mailer+N+Pl+Ine: mailerites
    mailer+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: mailereis
    mailer+N+Pl+Nom: mailerid
    mailer+N+Pl+Par: mailereid
    mailer+N+Pl+Tra: maileriteks
    mailer+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: mailereiks
    mailer+N+Pl+Trm: maileriteni
    mailer+N+Sg+Abe: mailerita
    mailer+N+Sg+Abl: mailerilt
    mailer+N+Sg+Ade: maileril
    mailer+N+Sg+All: mailerile
    mailer+N+Sg+Com: maileriga
    mailer+N+Sg+Ela: mailerist
    mailer+N+Sg+Ess: mailerina
    mailer+N+Sg+Gen: maileri
    mailer+N+Sg+Ill: mailerisse
    mailer+N+Sg+Ine: maileris
    mailer+N+Sg+Nom: mailer
    mailer+N+Sg+Par: mailerit
    mailer+N+Sg+Tra: maileriks
    mailer+N+Sg+Trm: mailerini
    maja+N+Pl+Abe: majadeta
    maja+N+Pl+Abl: majadelt
    maja+N+Pl+Ade: majadel
    maja+N+Pl+All: majadele
    maja+N+Pl+Com: majadega
    maja+N+Pl+Ela: majadest
    maja+N+Pl+Ess: majadena
    maja+N+Pl+Gen: majade
    maja+N+Pl+Ill: majadesse
    maja+N+Pl+Ine: majades
    maja+N+Pl+Nom: majad
    maja+N+Pl+Par: maju
    maja+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: majasid
    maja+N+Pl+Tra: majadeks
    maja+N+Pl+Trm: majadeni
    maja+N+Sg+Abe: majata
    maja+N+Sg+Abl: majalt
    maja+N+Sg+Ade: majal
    maja+N+Sg+All: majale
    maja+N+Sg+Com: majaga
    maja+N+Sg+Ela: majast
    maja+N+Sg+Ess: majana
    maja+N+Sg+Gen: maja
    maja+N+Sg+Ill: majja
    maja+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: majasse
    maja+N+Sg+Ine: majas
    maja+N+Sg+Nom: maja
    maja+N+Sg+Par: maja
    maja+N+Sg+Tra: majaks
    maja+N+Sg+Trm: majani
    malkel+N+Pl+Abe: malkeliteta
    malkel+N+Pl+Abl: malkelitelt
    malkel+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: malkeleilt
    malkel+N+Pl+Ade: malkelitel
    malkel+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: malkeleil
    malkel+N+Pl+All: malkelitele
    malkel+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: malkeleile
    malkel+N+Pl+Com: malkelitega
    malkel+N+Pl+Ela: malkelitest
    malkel+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: malkeleist
    malkel+N+Pl+Ess: malkelitena
    malkel+N+Pl+Gen: malkelite
    malkel+N+Pl+Ill: malkelitesse
    malkel+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: malkeleisse
    malkel+N+Pl+Ine: malkelites
    malkel+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: malkeleis
    malkel+N+Pl+Nom: malkelid
    malkel+N+Pl+Par: malkeleid
    malkel+N+Pl+Tra: malkeliteks
    malkel+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: malkeleiks
    malkel+N+Pl+Trm: malkeliteni
    malkel+N+Sg+Abe: malkelita
    malkel+N+Sg+Abl: malkelilt
    malkel+N+Sg+Ade: malkelil
    malkel+N+Sg+All: malkelile
    malkel+N+Sg+Com: malkeliga
    malkel+N+Sg+Ela: malkelist
    malkel+N+Sg+Ess: malkelina
    malkel+N+Sg+Gen: malkeli
    malkel+N+Sg+Ill: malkelisse
    malkel+N+Sg+Ine: malkelis
    malkel+N+Sg+Nom: malkel
    malkel+N+Sg+Par: malkelit
    malkel+N+Sg+Tra: malkeliks
    malkel+N+Sg+Trm: malkelini
    manner+N+Pl+Abe: mandriteta
    manner+N+Pl+Abl: mandritelt
    manner+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: mandreilt
    manner+N+Pl+Ade: mandritel
    manner+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: mandreil
    manner+N+Pl+All: mandritele
    manner+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: mandreile
    manner+N+Pl+Com: mandritega
    manner+N+Pl+Ela: mandritest
    manner+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: mandreist
    manner+N+Pl+Ess: mandritena
    manner+N+Pl+Gen: mandrite
    manner+N+Pl+Ill: mandritesse
    manner+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: mandreisse
    manner+N+Pl+Ine: mandrites
    manner+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: mandreis
    manner+N+Pl+Nom: mandrid
    manner+N+Pl+Par: mandreid
    manner+N+Pl+Tra: mandriteks
    manner+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: mandreiks
    manner+N+Pl+Trm: mandriteni
    manner+N+Sg+Abe: mandrita
    manner+N+Sg+Abl: mandrilt
    manner+N+Sg+Ade: mandril
    manner+N+Sg+All: mandrile
    manner+N+Sg+Com: mandriga
    manner+N+Sg+Ela: mandrist
    manner+N+Sg+Ess: mandrina
    manner+N+Sg+Gen: mandri
    manner+N+Sg+Ill: mandrisse
    manner+N+Sg+Ine: mandris
    manner+N+Sg+Nom: manner
    manner+N+Sg+Par: mandrit
    manner+N+Sg+Tra: mandriks
    manner+N+Sg+Trm: mandrini
    mees+N+Pl+Abe: meesteta
    mees+N+Pl+Abl: meestelt
    mees+N+Pl+Ade: meestel
    mees+N+Pl+All: meestele
    mees+N+Pl+Com: meestega
    mees+N+Pl+Ela: meestest
    mees+N+Pl+Ess: meestena
    mees+N+Pl+Gen: meeste
    mees+N+Pl+Ill: meestesse
    mees+N+Pl+Ine: meestes
    mees+N+Pl+Nom: mehed
    mees+N+Pl+Par: mehi
    mees+N+Pl+Tra: meesteks
    mees+N+Pl+Trm: meesteni
    mees+N+Sg+Abe: meheta
    mees+N+Sg+Abl: mehelt
    mees+N+Sg+Ade: mehel
    mees+N+Sg+All: mehele
    mees+N+Sg+Com: mehega
    mees+N+Sg+Ela: mehest
    mees+N+Sg+Ess: mehena
    mees+N+Sg+Gen: mehe
    mees+N+Sg+Ill: mehesse
    mees+N+Sg+Ine: mehes
    mees+N+Sg+Nom: mees
    mees+N+Sg+Par: meest
    mees+N+Sg+Tra: meheks
    mees+N+Sg+Trm: meheni
